District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Peer-to-Peer Car Sharing Rental Vehicle Sales Tax Clarification
Temporary Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 7012 of the Fiscal Year 2027 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2026,
enacted August 13, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-416; 73 DCR 11509) is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(1)(B) is amended to read as follows:
“(4B) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges for the
rental or leasing of rental vehicles and utility trailers as defined in § 50-1505.01 shall be:
“(i) 9.25% beginning October 1, 2018, through September 30,
2026; and
“(ii) 11% beginning on October 1, 2026, and continuing
thereafter.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
“(3B) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges for the
rental or leasing of rental vehicles and utility trailers as defined in § 50-1505.01 shall be:
“(i) 9.25% beginning October 1, 2018, through September 30,
2026; and
“(ii) 11% beginning on October 1, 2026, and continuing
thereafter.”.
Sec. 3. Section 7012 of the Fiscal Year 2027 Budget Support Act of 2026, enacted August
14, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-418; 73 DCR 11735) is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(1)(B) is amended to read as follows:
“(4B) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges for the
rental or leasing of rental vehicles and utility trailers as defined in § 50-1505.01 shall be:
“(i) 9.25% beginning October 1, 2018, through September 30,
2026; and
“(ii) 11% beginning on October 1, 2026, and continuing
thereafter.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(3B) The rate of tax on the gross receipts from the sale of or charges for the
rental or leasing of rental vehicles and utility trailers as defined in § 50-1505.01 shall be:
“(i) 9.25% beginning October 1, 2018, through September 30,
2026; and


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
“(ii) 11% beginning on October 1, 2026, and continuing
thereafter.”.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of October 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of having taken effect.